Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.36.010

Definitions.

Capital notes or debentures, where used in this chapter, shall mean notes or other obligations issued by a bank or mutual savings bank, for money obtained and used as additional capital or to replace impaired capital stock: PROVIDED, Such notes or other obligations are subordinate to the rights of depositors and other creditors.

The term "capital" where used in this chapter shall mean capital stock and/or capital notes.

[ 2014 c 37 s 204; 1955 c 33 s 30.36.010. Prior: 1935 c 42 s 1; RRS s 3295-1. Formerly RCW 30.36.010.]